North Carolina statutes. Chapter 87. Contractors.
Article 7B. Well Contractors Certification Commission.

§ 87-99.
Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in

G.S. 87-85

and

G.S. 87-98.2

apply in this Part.

History.

1997-358, s. 1; renumbered from N.C. Gen. Stat. § 143B-301.10 by 2021-180, s. 9G.7(b).

Editor's Note.

This Article is former Part 9A of Article 7 of Chapter 143B. It was recodified as this Article by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9G.7(b), effective July 1, 2021. The historical citations to the sections in the former Part have been added to the corresponding sections in this Article as recodified.

This section is former G.S. 143B-301.10. It was recodified as this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9G.7(b), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021’.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9G.7(b), effective July 1, 2021, recodified G.S. 143B-301.10 as this section; and substituted “Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions” for “The definitions” at the beginning.

§ 87-99.1.
Creation, powers, and duties of the Commission.

Creation and Duties. — There is established within the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the Well Contractors Certification Commission. The Commission shall:

Adopt rules with respect to the certification of well contractors as provided by Article 7A of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes.

Exercise quasi-judicial powers in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The Commission shall make the final agency decision on any matter involving the certification of well contractors pursuant to Article 7A of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes and on civil penalties assessed for violations of that Article or rules adopted pursuant to that Article.

Adopt rules as may be required to secure a federal grant-in-aid for a program concerned with the certification of well contractors. This subdivision is to be liberally construed in order that the State and its citizens may benefit from federal grants-in-aid.

Delegation. — The Commission may, by rule, delegate to the Secretary of Health and Human Services any of its powers, other than the power to adopt rules.

History.

1997-358, s. 1; renumbered from N.C. Gen. Stat. § 143B-301.11 by 2021-180, s. 9G.7(b).

Editor's Note.

This section is former G.S. 143B-301.11. It was recodified as this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9G.7(b), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021’.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9G.7(b), effective July 1, 2021, recodified G.S. 143B-301.11 as this section; rewrote the introductory paragraph of subsection (a); and substituted “Secretary of Health and Human Services” for “Secretary” in subsection (b).

§ 87-99.2.
Membership of Commission.

Appointments. — The Commission shall consist of seven members appointed as follows:

One member appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives who, at the time of appointment, is (i) engaged in well contractor activities, (ii) certified as a well contractor under Article 7A of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes, (iii) engaged primarily in the construction, installation, repair, alteration, or abandonment of domestic water supply wells, and (iv) a resident of a county that is located east of or is traversed by Interstate 95.

One member appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives who, at the time of appointment, is (i) engaged in well contractor activities, (ii) certified as a well contractor under Article 7A of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes, (iii) engaged primarily in the construction, installation, repair, alteration, or abandonment of domestic water supply wells, and (iv) a resident of a county that is located wholly west of Interstate 95.

One member appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate who, at the time of appointment, is (i) engaged in well contractor activities, (ii) certified as a well contractor under Article 7A of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes, and (iii) engaged primarily in the construction, installation, repair, alteration, or abandonment of industrial, municipal, or other large capacity water supply wells.

One member appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate who, at the time of appointment, is (i) engaged in well contractor activities, (ii) certified as a well contractor under Article 7A of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes, and (iii) engaged primarily in the construction, installation, repair, alteration, or abandonment of nonwater supply wells, such as monitoring or recovery wells.

One member appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives who, at the time of appointment, is (i) employed by a local county health department and (ii) actively engaged in well inspection and permitting.

One member appointed by the General Assembly upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate who, at the time of appointment, is (i) employed by a local county health department and (ii) actively engaged in well inspection and permitting.

One member appointed by the Governor who is (i) appointed from the public at large, (ii) not engaged in well contractor activities, and (iii) not an employee of a firm or corporation engaged in well contractor activities or a State or county governmental agency.

Additional Qualifications. — Appointment of members to fill positions (1), (2), (3), and (4) shall be made from among all those persons who are recommended for appointment to the Commission by any person who is engaged in well contractor activities and who is certified as a well contractor under Article 7A of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes. No person shall be appointed to the Commission who is a resident of, or has a principal place of business in, the same county as another member of the Commission.

Terms. — Appointments to the Commission shall be for terms of three years. The terms of members appointed to fill positions (1), (2), and (7) shall expire on 30 June of years evenly divisible by three. The terms of members appointed to fill positions (3) and (4) shall expire on 30 June of years that follow by one year those years that are evenly divisible by three. The terms of members appointed to fill positions (5) and (6) shall expire on 30 June of years that precede by one year those years that are evenly divisible by three. Members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. No member shall serve more than two consecutive terms.

Officers. — The Commission shall elect a Chair and a Vice-Chair from among its members. These officers shall serve from the time of their election until 30 June of the following year, or until a successor is elected.

Vacancies. — An appointment to fill a vacancy on the Commission created by the resignation, dismissal, disability, or death of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term. Vacancies in appointments made by the General Assembly shall be filled as provided in

G.S. 120-122

.

Removal. — The Governor may remove any member of the Commission from office for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance, as provided in G.S. 143B-13.

Compensation. — The members of the Commission shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

.

Quorum. — A majority of the membership of the Commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

Services. — All clerical and other services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the Secretary.

History.

1997-358, s. 1; 2002-165, s. 1.11; renumbered from N.C. Gen. Stat. § 143B-301.12 by 2021-180, s. 9G.7(b).

Editor's Note.

This section is former G.S. 143B-301.12. It was recodified as this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9G.7(b), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021’.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§§
87-99.3 through 87-99.9

Reserved for future codification purposes.